Massachusetts, session 194th, SD3643.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 2 of chapter 90 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2024 Official Edition, is
hereby amended by inserting after the seventh paragraph the following paragraph:-
Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, the registrar shall not issue
confidential or undercover registration plates to United States immigration and customs
enforcement or its sworn officers or agents for any stated justification, including, but not limited
to, for the purposes of undercover law enforcement. Any such previously issued confidential
registration shall be revoked not later than 30 days after the effective date of this paragraph and
shall not be eligible for renewal.
of 1